src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_kielas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kiärun: # 2B
    kiärun+N+Sg+Nom: kiärun 
    kiärun+N+Sg+Gen: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Acc: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊṛunân
    kiärun+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊṛunist
    kiärun+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊṛunáin
    kiärun+N+Sg+Abe: kiärrunttáá
    kiärun+N+Ess: kiäˊṛunin # r7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kiärun+N+Par: kiäˊṛunid # r7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kiärun+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊṛuneh
    kiärun+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊṛunij
    kiärun+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊṛunijd
    kiärun+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊṛunáid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊṛunijn
    kiärun+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊṛunijguin
    kiärun+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊṛunijttáá


  Noun - kielâs: # 2A
    kielâs+N+Sg+Nom: kielâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Ill: kieˊḷâsân
    kielâs+N+Sg+Loc: kieˊḷâsist
    kielâs+N+Sg+Com: kieˊḷâsáin
    kielâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiellâsttáá
    kielâs+N+Ess: kieˊḷâsin # l7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kielâs+N+Par: kieˊḷâsid # l7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kielâs+N+Pl+Nom: kieˊḷâseh
    kielâs+N+Pl+Gen: kieˊḷâsij
    kielâs+N+Pl+Acc: kieˊḷâsijd
    kielâs+N+Pl+Ill: kieˊḷâsáid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Loc: kieˊḷâsijn
    kielâs+N+Pl+Com: kieˊḷâsijguin   
    kielâs+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊḷâsijttáá   

  Noun - kieles: # MLO, ok; subst + adj
    kieles+N+Sg+Nom: kieles
    kieles+N+Sg+Gen: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Acc: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊḷásân
    kieles+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊḷásist
    kieles+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊḷásáin
    kieles+N+Sg+Abe: kiällásttáá
    kieles+N+Ess:    kielesin
    kieles+N+Par:    kielesid
    kieles+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊḷáseh
    kieles+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊḷásij
    kieles+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊḷásijd
    kieles+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊḷásáid
    kieles+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊḷásijn
    kieles+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊḷásijguin
    kieles+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊḷásijttáá

  Noun - peles+v2: # MLO, ok
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Nom: peˊles
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Gen: piälˊlás
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Acc: piälˊlás
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Ill: piäˊḷásân
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Loc: piäˊḷásist
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Com: piäˊḷásáin
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Abe: piälˊlásttáá
    peles+v2+N+Ess: peˊlesin
    peles+v2+N+Par: peˊlesid
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Nom: piäˊḷáseh
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Gen: piäˊḷásij
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Acc: piäˊḷásijd
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Ill: piäˊḷásáid
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Loc: piäˊḷásijn
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Com: piäˊḷásijguin
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Abe: piäˊḷásijttáá
